Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 24 Initiative and Referendum

Cross references. —

As to initiative and referendum in regard to municipal ordinances, see §§

22-23-1001

to

22-23-1007

.

Secretary of state not to adopt rules implementing initiative and referendum. —

Since the constitutional provisions for initiative and referendum, coupled with applicable statutes, are considered self-executing and thereby require no act of implementation, neither art. 3, § 52, Wyo. Const. nor this chapter authorizes the secretary of state to adopt rules to implement procedures relative to initiative and referendum. Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of signer of petition to withdraw therefrom or revoke withdrawal and time therefor, 27 ALR2d 604.